Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2623
Insurance consultant's license; examination; reexamination; fee.

An applicant for a license under sections 44-2606 to 44-2635 shall pay or cause to be paid an examination fee as established by the director in advance of such examination. The fee shall not exceed one hundred dollars and shall cover all of the examinations given to the applicant at the same time and place. The fee shall not be refunded to the applicant. Examination fees collected under sections 44-2606 to 44-2635 shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of Insurance Cash Fund unless the director contracts with an independent testing organization, in which case the applicant shall pay the examination fee directly to such independent testing organization and the fee shall be the amount charged by the testing organization.

Laws 1980, LB 481, § 18;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 210.